South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S89.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 25-11-100 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 25-11-100. (A) There is hereby established the South Carolina Military Base Task ForceAffairs Advisory Council for the purpose of sustaining and expanding the military presence in South Carolina enhancing the value of military installations and facilities and the quality of life for military personnel located in this State. The task forcecouncil shall assist coordinate with military communities to support mission readiness for installations and improve the quality of life for service members and their families with such value enhancement, address the various incentives to military personnel assigned in this State, coordinate the efforts of the military communities, and provide for other methods and incentives to accomplish these purposes. The task forcecouncil shall coordinate efforts among the public and the private sectors to maintain a the significant presence of the United States Department of Defense and the United States Department of Homeland Security presence in South Carolina. The task forcecouncil shall advise the secretary, Governor, and the General Assembly on any issues and strategies related to military base closures, realignments, and mission changes. (B)(1) The task forcecouncil shall be comprised of the following members or their designees: (a) South Carolina Adjutant General; (b) Secretary of the South Carolina Department of Commerce; (c) Executive Director of the South Carolina Chamber of Commerce; (d) Chief Executive Officer of the Aiken Chamber of Commerce; (d)(e) Chief Executive Officer of the Beaufort Chamber of Commerce; (e)(f) Chief Executive Officer of the Charleston Metro Chamber of Commerce; (f)(g) Chief Executive Officer of the Columbia Chamber of Commerce; (g)(h) Chief Executive Officer of the Sumter Chamber of Commerce; (i) Chairperson of the Aiken County Council; (h)(j) Chairperson of the Beaufort County Council; (i)(k) Chairperson of the Berkeley County Council; (j)(l) Chairperson of the Dorchester County Council; (k)(m) Chairperson of the Charleston County Council; (l)(n) Chairperson of the Richland County Council; (m)(o) Chairperson of the Sumter County Council; (p) Chairperson of the Edgefield County Council; (q) Mayor of North Augusta; (n)(r) Mayor of Beaufort; (o)(s) Mayor of Charleston; (p)(t) Mayor of Columbia; (q)(u) Mayor of North Charleston; (r)(v) Mayor of Port Royal; (s)(w) Mayor of Sumter; (t)(x)one or more members of the Senate or the House of Representatives appointed by the Governor; and (u)(y) five six at-large members appointed by the Governor who have demonstrated experience in one or more of the following areas:  economic development, defense industry, military installation operation, environmental issues, finance, local government, or senior military leadership, of whom: (i) four five shall represent, respectively, the four five military communities counties of Aiken, Beaufort, Charleston, Columbia,Richland, and Sumter, and each shall reside in the military community county that he is appointed to represent;  and (ii) the fifth sixth at-large member shall serve as the task force chairman. (2) The Governor secretary may designate any one of the members of the task forcecouncil as its vice chairman. (C) Staff support and other resources as necessary may be provided through funding by the General Assembly and/or other resources, which shall be administered by the department to assist the task forcecouncil in carrying out the directives of this section. (D) The task force chairman shall appoint ancouncil's executive committee shall consist consisting of the chairman; vice chairman, if any; Adjutant General, or his designee; Secretary of Commerce, or his designee;  Executive Coordinator, if any;  and the four five at-large task force council members who represent the four five military communities counties of Aiken, Beaufort, Charleston, ColumbiaRichland, and Sumter. (E) The task forcecouncil executive committee shall also act as an executive advisory committee to the Governor secretary and the General Assembly on various military matters that affect this State and shall coordinate an annual meeting between the secretary, Governor, military commanders, and General Assembly members geographically representing military communities to discuss items of interest to all parties and exchange pertinent information on the current climate and challenges facing our state's military installations and their personnel. (F) Upon the approval of the secretary, the task forcecouncil may pursue specialists to provide information and assistance, develop strategic plans, and assist in executing strategies to support military installations and their related military communities to maximize the potential for increased investment by the United States Department of Defense or other defense-related federal agencies and defense-related businesses in this State. (G) The council shall convene no less than once every calendar year at such times as requested by the council's chairperson, secretary, or the Governor. (H) Members of the executive committee shall be recommended by the county legislative delegation to the Governor for consideration for appointment. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----